District of Columbia statutes.
38-2554

Composition of the Task Force.

(a)

The Task Force shall be comprised of the following 9 voting members, or designees thereof:

(1)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia;

(2)

The Chair of the Committee on Education, Libraries and Recreation for the Council of the District of Columbia;

(3)

The Chair of the Committee of Finance and Revenue for the Council of the District of Columbia;

(4)

The President of the Board of Education;

(5)

The Superintendent of the District of Columbia Public Schools;

(6)

The State Education Officer of the District of Columbia;

(7)

The Deputy Mayor for Children, Youth, Families and Elders;

(8)

The Chief Financial Officer for the District of Columbia; and

(9)

The Chief Financial Officer for the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(b)

The following shall serve as advisory, nonvoting members of the Task Force:

(1)

The members of the Council’s Committee on Education, Libraries and Recreation;

(2)

The department head or designee of the Office of Special Education;

(3)

The department head or designee of the Committee on Special Education and Student Services for the Board of Education;

(4)

The Corporation Counsel for the District of Columbia;

(5)

The department head or designee of the Department of Mental Health;

(6)

The department head or designee of the Child and Family Service Agency;

(7)

The department head or designee of the Medical Assistance Administration;

(8)

The department head or designee of the Office of Medicaid Public Provider Operation Reform;

(9)

The representative of the State Advisory Panel on Special Education in the District of Columbia; and

(10)

Two parents of District of Columbia Special Education students.

(c)

The Task Force shall be co-chaired by the Mayor and the Chair of the Committee on Education, Libraries and Recreation for the Council of the District of Columbia.

(d)

The Director of the State Education Office shall provide staffing for the Task Force.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 375, 50 DCR 5668
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Special Education Task Force Establishment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-232, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10729).